Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 3. Jurisdiction

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

§ 20-5-301.
Initial child custody jurisdiction.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

20-5-304

, a court of this state has jurisdiction to make an initial child custody determination only if:

This state is the home state of the child on the date of the commencement of the proceeding, or was the home state of the child within six (6) months before the commencement of the proceeding and the child is absent from this state but a parent or person acting as a parent continues to live in this state;

A court of another state does not have jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with paragraph (i) of this subsection, or a court of the home state of the child has declined to exercise jurisdiction on the ground that this state is the more appropriate forum under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-307

or

20-5-308

, and:

The child and the child’s parents, or the child and at least one (1) parent or a person acting as a parent, have a significant connection with this state other than mere physical presence; and

Substantial evidence is available in this state concerning the child’s care, protection, training and personal relationships.

All courts of another state having jurisdiction under provisions of law from that state in substantial conformity with paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection have declined to exercise jurisdiction on the ground that a court of this state is the more appropriate forum to determine the custody of the child under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-307

or

20-5-308

; or

No court of any other state would have jurisdiction under the criteria specified in paragraph (i), (ii) or (iii) of this subsection.

Subsection (a) of this section shall be the exclusive jurisdictional basis for making a child custody determination by a court of this state.

Physical presence of, or personal jurisdiction over, a party or a child shall not be necessary or sufficient to make a child custody determination.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Jurisdiction conferred in section pertains to custody determination only.

Rodgers v. Rodgers, 627 P.2d 1381,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 339

(Wyo. 1981).

As section does not confer jurisdiction to award child support.

Rodgers v. Rodgers, 627 P.2d 1381,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 339

(Wyo. 1981).

Suit for collection of child support was properly within jurisdiction of district court,

even though the amount claimed was less than $7,000, where plaintiff requested the court to grant her specific performance of all the terms in a separation agreement and her complaint raised issues of child custody under this section. Daulton v. Daulton, 774 P.2d 635,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 131

(Wyo. 1989).

Wyoming district court retains in personam jurisdiction

over the mother to enforce the visitation provisions of the original divorce decree through a contempt action even though she left the jurisdiction. Marquiss v. Marquiss, 837 P.2d 25,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. Aug. 18, 1992).

The Wyoming district court where the original decree was granted had continuing subject matter and in personam jurisdiction to enforce its original visitation order by issuing an order to show cause why the mother should not be held in contempt for denying the father court-ordered visitation. Marquiss v. Marquiss, 837 P.2d 25,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. Aug. 18, 1992).

Foreign state cannot assume jurisdiction. —

A foreign state which is neither a decree state nor a home state may not assume jurisdiction in contravention to Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act and Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act preference for “home state” jurisdiction. State ex rel. Griffin v. District Court, 831 P.2d 233,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1992).

Judicial discretion. —

Even in cases where Wyoming is the original decree state, when issue of concurrent jurisdiction is raised, court has duty to make a determination whether to exercise its discretion and retain jurisdiction over the matter or defer to courts of other state; court abuses its discretion if it retains jurisdiction solely on grounds that it issued original decree, since existence of jurisdiction is not determinative of whether that jurisdiction should be exercised under circumstances of a particular case. Steele v. Neeman, 6 P.3d 649,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2000).

Evidence sufficient to support Wyoming court's claimed jurisdiction in multi-state custodial entanglement. —

See Quenzer v. Quenzer, 653 P.2d 295,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 398

(Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 460 U.S. 1041, 103 S. Ct. 1436, 75 L. Ed. 2d 794, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 4204 (U.S. 1983).

Court had emergency custody jurisdiction to modify Texas custody order. —

The court heard unchallenged evidence that the children in question were currently present in Wyoming and that the husband, who had custody under the Texas order, had assaulted the wife and the children. Rosics v. Heath, 746 P.2d 1284,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 561

(Wyo. 1987), overruled, Marquiss v. Marquiss, 837 P.2d 25,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1992).

Order compelling visitation proper exercise of discretion. —

District court's order compelling the mother to deliver the children to Wyoming for visitation was a proper exercise of discretion under the district court's continuing jurisdiction as the decree court; the district court's order was appropriate to enforce visitation and, consequently, not some character of child custody decree modification. Marquiss v. Marquiss, 837 P.2d 25,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. Aug. 18, 1992).

Jurisdictional requirements not met. —

Wyoming court improperly assumed jurisdiction under the significant connection provisions in former Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-5-104(a)(ii) where Texas was the minor child's “home state” under former Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§ 20-5-103(a)(v) and 20-5-104(a)(i) and Tex. Fam. Code Ann. § 152.201(a)(1). A foreign state which is neither a decree state nor a home state may not assume jurisdiction in contravention to the preference in the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act and the Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act, 28 U.S.C.S. § 1738A(c)(2)(A)(ii), for home state jurisdiction. NMC v. JLW ex rel. NAW, 2004 WY 56, 90 P.3d 93,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 70

(Wyo. 2004).

Where the children were not present in the state for six months before the divorce proceedings were commenced and where the court was not able to determine whether subject matter jurisdiction existed under one of the other jurisdictional options under this section, the district court lacked subject matter jurisdiction over the child custody and support issues. Weller v. Weller, 960 P.2d 493,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 1998).

Jurisdiction properly declined. —

The district court properly declined to exercise jurisdiction to hear Wyoming mother's motion to change custody where the children had lived with their father in Georgia for over two years and it was clear that Georgia was the location of significant evidence concerning the children's care, protection, training and personal relationships. Ritter v. Ritter, 989 P.2d 109,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1999).

Emergency jurisdiction. —

Although children had not lived in Wyoming for six months before the commencement of a custody proceeding, as required under
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-5-301(a)(i), because the evidence showed that they were abused in Texas by their mother's boyfriend, a Wyoming trial court could exercise emergency jurisdiction under the UCCJEA.
SC v. State (In re NC), 2013 WY 2, 294 P.3d 866,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2013).

Cited

in

Prickett v. Prickett, 2007 WY 153, 167 P.3d 661,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Sept. 25, 2007).

§ 20-5-302.
Exclusive, continuing jurisdiction.

Except as provided in W.S.

20-5-304

, a court of this state which has made a child custody determination consistent with W.S.

20-5-301

or

20-5-303

has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction over the determination until:

A court of this state determines that the child, the child’s parents and any person acting as a parent do not have a significant connection with this state and that substantial evidence is no longer available in this state concerning the child’s care, protection, training and personal relationships; or

A court of this state or a court of another state determines that the child, the child’s parents and any person acting as a parent do not presently reside in this state.

A court of this state which has made a child custody determination and does not have exclusive, continuing jurisdiction under this section may modify that determination only if it has jurisdiction to make an initial determination under W.S.

20-5-301

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Jurisdiction established. —

Use of the conjunctive “and” requires both conditions in this section to be met; therefore, Wyoming district court had exclusive, continuing jurisdiction to resolve custody and visitation issues arising from the entry of a divorce decree in Wyoming because a father still had substantial connections to Wyoming since he resided there. The mother had relocated to Nebraska with the children.
Prickett v. Prickett, 2007 WY 153, 167 P.3d 661,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 2007).

Cited in

Waldron v. Waldron, 2015 WY 64,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(May 1, 2015).

NC v. State, 2013 WY 2,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Jan 9, 2013).

§ 20-5-303.
Jurisdiction to modify determination.

Except as provided in W.S.

20-5-304

, a court of this state may not modify a child custody determination made by a court of another state unless the court of this state has jurisdiction to make an initial determination under W.S. 20-5-301(a)(i) or (ii) and:

The court of the other state determines it no longer has exclusive, continuing jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-302

or that a court of this state would be a more convenient forum under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-307

; or

A court of this state or a court of the other state determines that the child, the child’s parents and any person acting as a parent do not presently reside in the other state.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Factors considered in determining jurisdiction of second state in custody question. —

When child custody is awarded in a divorce decree in one state and the child-custody question is later presented to a court of another state, a number of considerations affect the determination as to whether the second state may exercise jurisdiction, including: domicile, presence in the state, lack of jurisdiction in the first state to render the original decree, forum shopping, child stealing, best interests of the child, full faith and credit, comity, child abuse, abandonment, etc. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Jurisdiction properly declined. —

The district court properly declined to exercise jurisdiction to hear Wyoming mother's motion to change custody where the children had lived with their father in Georgia for over two years and it was clear that Georgia was the location of significant evidence concerning the children's care, protection, training and personal relationships. Ritter v. Ritter, 989 P.2d 109,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1999).

Challenge of order barred by bad faith. —

Where the mother stipulated and agreed that the child could leave the state of Wisconsin only as ordered by the court, that the child could not be removed from the state for the purposes of changing residency and that the period of visitation to the mother each summer be for only a five-week period, and these agreements were incorporated into a Wisconsin court order, the mother's violation of these orders constituted bad faith and unclean hands such as to bar the mother from challenging in Wyoming a Wisconsin order awarding the child to the husband. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Timing of requisite findings for modification of foreign custody decree. —

Before modifying a custody decree of foreign jurisdiction, a Wyoming court must find that the court which originally rendered the decree no longer has proper jurisdiction or has declined to assume jurisdiction; and the court must make this determination, not at the commencement of the Wyoming action, but at the time of the hearing on the decree. Quenzer v. Quenzer, 653 P.2d 295,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 398

(Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 460 U.S. 1041, 103 S. Ct. 1436, 75 L. Ed. 2d 794, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 4204 (U.S. 1983).

Factors considered in determining jurisdiction of second state in custody question. —

When child custody is awarded in a divorce decree in one state and the child-custody question is later presented to a court of another state, a number of considerations affect the determination as to whether the second state may exercise jurisdiction, including: domicile, presence in the state, lack of jurisdiction in first state to render the original decree, forum shopping, child stealing, best interests of the child, full faith and credit, comity, child abuse, abandonment, etc. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Cited

in

Prickett v. Prickett, 2007 WY 153, 167 P.3d 661,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Sept. 25, 2007).

§ 20-5-304.
Temporary emergency jurisdiction.

A court of this state has temporary emergency jurisdiction if the child is present in this state and the child has been abandoned or it is necessary in an emergency to protect the child because the child, the child’s sibling or a parent of the child is subjected to or threatened with mistreatment or abuse.

If there is no previous child custody determination that is entitled to be enforced under this act and a child custody proceeding has not been commenced in a court of a state having jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-301

through

20-5-303

, a child custody determination made under this section remains in effect until an order is obtained from a court of a state having jurisdiction under a provision of law in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-301

through

20-5-303

. If a child custody proceeding has not been or is not commenced in a court of a state having jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S. 20-5-301 through 20-5-303, a child custody determination made under this section becomes a final determination, if it so provides and this state becomes the home state of the child.

If there is a previous child custody determination that is entitled to be enforced under this act, or a child custody proceeding has been commenced in a court of a state having jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-301

through

20-5-303

, any order issued by a court of this state under this section shall specify in the order a period that the court considers adequate to allow the person seeking an order to obtain an order from the state having jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-301

through

20-5-303

. The order issued in this state remains in effect until an order is obtained from the other state within the period specified or the period expires.

A court of this state which has been asked to make a child custody determination under this section, upon being informed that a child custody proceeding has been commenced in, or a child custody determination has been made by, a court of another state having jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-301

through

20-5-303

, shall immediately communicate with the other court. A court of this state which is exercising jurisdiction pursuant to W.S.

20-5-301

through

20-5-303

, upon being informed that a child custody proceeding has been commenced in, or a child custody determination has been made by, a court of another state under a statute similar to this section shall immediately communicate with the court of that state to resolve the emergency, protect the safety of the parties and the child and determine a period for the duration of the temporary order.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

Sufficient evidence of abuse. —

Because sufficient evidence showed that children had been abused in Texas by their mother's boyfriend, a Wyoming trial court had before it sufficient evidence to warrant emergency jurisdiction under the UCCJEA,
Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 20-5-304(a).
SC v. State (In re NC), 2013 WY 2, 294 P.3d 866,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 2013).

Cited

in

Prickett v. Prickett, 2007 WY 153, 167 P.3d 661,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Sept. 25, 2007).

§ 20-5-305.
Notice; opportunity to be heard; joinder.

Before a child custody determination is made under this act, notice and an opportunity to be heard in accordance with the standards of W.S.

20-5-208

shall be given to all persons entitled to notice under the law of this state as in child custody proceedings between residents of this state, any parent whose parental rights have not been previously terminated and any person having physical custody of the child.

This act shall not govern the enforceability of a child custody determination made without notice or an opportunity to be heard.

The obligation to join a party and the right to intervene as a party in a child custody proceeding under this act are governed by the law of this state as in child custody proceedings between residents of this state.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Notice of hearing is not normally given to parties in default.

Rodgers v. Rodgers, 627 P.2d 1381,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 339

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 20-5-306.
Simultaneous proceedings.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

20-5-304

, a court of this state may not exercise its jurisdiction under this article if, at the time of the commencement of the proceeding, a proceeding concerning the custody of the child has been commenced in a court of another state having jurisdiction substantially in conformity with this act, unless the proceeding has been terminated or is stayed by the court of the other state because a court of this state is a more convenient forum under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-307

.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

20-5-304

, a court of this state, before hearing a child custody proceeding, shall examine the court documents and other information supplied by the parties pursuant to W.S.

20-5-309

. If the court determines that a child custody proceeding has been commenced in a court in another state having jurisdiction substantially in accordance with this act, the court of this state shall stay its proceeding and communicate with the court of the other state. If the court of the state having jurisdiction under the laws of that state in substantial conformity with this act does not determine that the court of this state is a more appropriate forum, the court of this state shall dismiss the proceeding.

In a proceeding to modify a child custody determination, a court of this state shall determine whether a proceeding to enforce the determination has been commenced in another state. If a proceeding to enforce a child custody determination has been commenced in another state, the court may:

Stay the proceeding for modification pending the entry of an order of a court of the other state enforcing, staying, denying or dismissing the proceeding for enforcement;

Enjoin the parties from continuing with the proceeding for enforcement; or

Proceed with the modification under conditions it considers appropriate.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Concurrent jurisdiction. —

Even in cases where Wyoming is the original decree state, when issue of concurrent jurisdiction is raised, court has duty to make a determination whether to exercise its discretion and retain jurisdiction over the matter or defer to courts of other state; court abuses its discretion if it retains jurisdiction solely on grounds that it issued original decree, since existence of jurisdiction is not determinative of whether that jurisdiction should be exercised under circumstances of a particular case. Steele v. Neeman, 6 P.3d 649,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 2000).

Order compelling visitation proper exercise of discretion. —

District court's order compelling the mother to deliver the children to Wyoming for visitation was a proper exercise of discretion under the district court's continuing jurisdiction as the decree court; the district court's order was appropriate to enforce visitation and, consequently, not some character of child custody decree modification. Marquiss v. Marquiss, 837 P.2d 25,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. Aug. 18, 1992).

Jurisdiction properly declined. —

The district court properly declined to exercise jurisdiction to hear Wyoming mother's motion to change custody where the children had lived with their father in Georgia for over two years and it was clear that Georgia was the location of significant evidence concerning the children's care, protection, training and personal relationships. Ritter v. Ritter, 989 P.2d 109,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1999).

Foreign state cannot assume jurisdiction. —

A foreign state which is neither a decree state nor a home state may not assume jurisdiction in contravention to Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act and Parental Kidnapping Prevention Act preference for “home state” jurisdiction. State ex rel. Griffin v. District Court, 831 P.2d 233,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 20-5-307.
Inconvenient forum.

A court of this state which has jurisdiction under this act to make a child custody determination may decline to exercise its jurisdiction at any time if it determines that it is an inconvenient forum under the circumstances and that a court of another state is a more appropriate forum. The issue of inconvenient forum may be raised upon motion of a party, the court’s own motion, or request of another court.

Before determining whether it is an inconvenient forum, a court of this state shall consider whether it is appropriate for a court of another state to exercise jurisdiction. For this purpose, the court shall allow the parties to submit information and shall consider all relevant factors, including:

Whether domestic violence has occurred and is likely to continue in the future and which state could best protect the parties and the child;

The length of time the child has resided outside this state;

The distance between the court in this state and the court in the state that would assume jurisdiction;

The relative financial circumstances of the parties;

Any agreement of the parties as to which state should assume jurisdiction;

The nature and location of the evidence required to resolve the pending litigation, including testimony of the child;

The ability of the court of each state to decide the issue expeditiously and the procedures necessary to present the evidence; and

The familiarity of the court of each state with the facts and issues in the pending litigation.

If a court of this state determines that it is an inconvenient forum and that a court of another state is a more appropriate forum, it shall stay the proceedings upon condition that a child custody proceeding be promptly commenced in another designated state and may impose any other condition the court considers just and proper.

A court of this state may decline to exercise its jurisdiction under this act if a child custody determination is incidental to an action for divorce or another proceeding while still retaining jurisdiction over the divorce or other proceeding.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

Factors. —

Decision to decline jurisdiction under this section is not based on fault. Rather, it is a determination of which forum is more appropriate.
Symington v. Symington, 2007 WY 154, 167 P.3d 658,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2007).

District court must consider “all relevant factors,” not just those articulated in this section, when deciding whether or not to decline jurisdiction.
Symington v. Symington, 2007 WY 154, 167 P.3d 658,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2007).

Not an inconvenient forum. —

There was no abuse of discretion in a district court's determination that Wyoming remained an appropriate jurisdictional forum under this section where a father resided in Wyoming, children visited there, they had not been out of Wyoming long, and the parties were not separated by a very long distance. The father's consent to registering the judgment in Nebraska was not the same as consenting to Nebraska's jurisdiction, and there was nothing to show that the jurisdictional requirements under Neb. Rev. Stat. § 43-1240 were satisfied.
Prickett v. Prickett, 2007 WY 153, 167 P.3d 661,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Wyo. 2007).

Jurisdiction declined. —

Motion to decline jurisdiction in a child custody case under this section was granted because the children had lived and attended school in Idaho for nearly two years, a new guardian ad litem was needed due to a withdrawal, and the district court in question was no longer convenient for a father due to his relocation.
Symington v. Symington, 2007 WY 154, 167 P.3d 658,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 2007).

Wyoming district court did not abuse its discretion when it declined to exercise jurisdiction to resolve child custody and visitation issues arising from the parties’ original Wyoming divorce decree because the court weighed the statutory factors and found that it was an inconvenient forum under the Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-5-201

et seq., as the parties lived in different, foreign countries. Pokrovskaya v. Van Genderen, 2021 WY 68, 487 P.3d 228,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2021).

Father's appeal
of an order denying his objection to the district court's decision
declining to exercise jurisdiction under the Uniform Child Custody
Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act was dismissed because the father's
failure to timely perfect an appeal from the order declining jurisdiction
prevented him from invoking the appellate jurisdiction of the supreme
court; the objection was nothing more than a motion for reconsideration
and did not toll the time for filing an appeal. Waldron v. Waldron, 2015 WY 64, 349 P.3d 974,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 2015).

§ 20-5-308.
Jurisdiction declined by reason of conduct.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

20-5-304

or by other law of this state, if a court of this state has jurisdiction under this act because a person seeking to invoke its jurisdiction has engaged in unjustifiable conduct, the court shall decline to exercise its jurisdiction unless:

The parents and all persons acting as parents have acquiesced in the exercise of jurisdiction;

A court of the state otherwise having jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-301

through

20-5-303

determines that this state is a more appropriate forum under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-307

; or

No court of any other state would have jurisdiction under the criteria specified in a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-301

through

20-5-303

.

If a court of this state declines to exercise its jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, it may provide an appropriate remedy to ensure the safety of the child and prevent a repetition of the unjustifiable conduct, including staying the proceeding until a child custody proceeding is commenced in a court having jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-301

through

20-5-303

.

If a court dismisses a petition or stays a proceeding because it declines to exercise its jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, it shall assess against the party seeking to invoke its jurisdiction necessary and reasonable expenses including costs, communication expenses, attorney fees, investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses and child care during the course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees are sought establishes that the assessment would be clearly inappropriate. The court may not assess fees, costs or expenses against this state unless authorized by law other than this act.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Factors considered in determining jurisdiction of second state in custody question. —

When child custody is awarded in a divorce decree in one state and the child-custody question is later presented to a court of another state, a number of considerations affect the determination as to whether the second state may exercise jurisdiction, including: domicile, presence in the state, lack of jurisdiction in first state to render the original decree, forum shopping, child stealing, best interest of the child, full faith and credit, comity, child abuse, abandonment, etc. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Challenge of order barred by bad faith. —

Where the mother stipulated and agreed that the child could leave the state of Wisconsin only as ordered by the court, that the child could not be removed from the state for the purposes of changing residency and that the period of visitation to the mother each summer be for only a five-week period, and these agreements were incorporated into a Wisconsin court order, the mother's violation of these orders constituted bad faith and unclean hands such as to bar the mother from challenging in Wyoming a Wisconsin order awarding the child to the husband. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

§ 20-5-309.
Information to be submitted to the court.

Subject to a confidentiality order entered pursuant to W.S.

35-21-112

or any other court order allowing a party to maintain confidentiality of addresses or other identifying information or other law providing for the confidentiality of procedures, addresses and other identifying information, in a child custody proceeding each party in its first pleading or in an attached affidavit shall give information, if reasonably ascertainable, under oath as to the child’s present address or whereabouts, the places where the child has lived during the last five (5) years and the names and present addresses of the persons with whom the child has lived during that period. The pleading or affidavit shall state whether the party:

Has participated, as a party or witness or in any other capacity, in any other proceeding concerning the custody of or visitation with the child, and if so, the pleading or affidavit shall identify the court, the case number and the date of the child custody determination, if any;

Knows of any proceeding that could affect the current proceeding, including proceedings for enforcement and proceedings relating to domestic violence, protective orders, termination of parental rights and adoptions, and if so, the pleading or affidavit shall identify the court, the case number and the nature of the proceeding; and

Knows the names and addresses of any person not a party to the proceeding who has physical custody of the child or claims rights of legal custody or physical custody of, or visitation with, the child, and if so, the pleading or affidavit shall list the names and addresses of those persons.

If the information required by subsection (a) of this section is not furnished, the court, upon motion of a party or its own motion, may stay the proceeding until the information is furnished.

If the declaration as to any of the items described in paragraphs (a)(i) through (iii) of this section is in the affirmative, the declarant shall give additional information under oath as required by the court. The court may examine the parties under oath as to details of the information furnished and other matters pertinent to the court’s jurisdiction and the disposition of the case.

Each party has a continuing duty to inform the court of any proceeding in this or any other state that could affect the current proceeding.

If a party alleges in an affidavit or a pleading under oath that the health, safety, or liberty of a party or child would be jeopardized by disclosure of identifying information, the information shall be sealed and may not be disclosed to the other party or the public unless the court orders the disclosure to be made after a hearing in which the court takes into consideration the health, safety or liberty of the party or child and determines that the disclosure is in the interest of justice.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1; 2013 ch. 98, § 2, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “confidentiality order entered pursuant to W.S.

35-21-112

or any other” in (a).

Subject matter jurisdiction. —

District court had subject matter jurisdiction over a father's petition to modify child custody and support; although the requirement to provide the information in his or her initial pleading is mandatory, the statute does not indicate it is jurisdictional but states that the court may stay the proceeding until the information is furnished, but it is not required to do so, and the statute does not say that the district court does not have jurisdiction over the matter if the requisite statement is omitted. Brush v. Davis, 2013 WY 161, 315 P.3d 648,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2013).

Trial court did not improperly award child custody when a mother's complaint did not provide statutorily required custody information because the court continued to have jurisdiction, so failing to provide this information did not render the court's decree void. Peak v. Peak, 2016 WY 109, 383 P.3d 1084,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 2016).

§ 20-5-310.
Appearance of parties and child.

In a child custody proceeding in this state, the court may order a party to the proceeding who is in this state to appear before the court in person with or without the child. The court may order any person who is in this state and who has physical custody or control of the child to appear in person with the child.

If a party to a child custody proceeding whose presence is desired by the court is outside this state, the court may order that a notice given pursuant to W.S.

20-5-208

include a statement directing the party to appear in person with or without the child and informing the party that failure to appear may result in a decision adverse to the party.

The court may enter any orders necessary to ensure the safety of the child and of any person ordered to appear under this section.

If a party to a child custody proceeding who is outside this state is directed to appear under subsection (b) of this section or desires to appear personally before the court with or without the child, the court may require another party to pay reasonable and necessary travel and other expenses of the party so appearing and of the child.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

No personal jurisdiction absent proper service. —

Where the father failed to effect proper service of his petition to modify the custody provisions of the divorce decree upon the mother, the district court did not acquire personal jurisdiction over the mother and could not enter a valid default judgment against her because of her failure to appear. Goss v. Goss, 780 P.2d 306,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 194

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Prickett v. Prickett, 2007 WY 153, 167 P.3d 661,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 165

(Sept. 25, 2007).